Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.100

Development rights available for transfer to receiving cities.

Only development rights from agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance within the eligible counties as determined under RCW 39.108.040, and rural-zoned lands with the eligible counties designated under RCW 39.108.050, may be available for transfer to receiving cities in accordance with this chapter.

[ 2011 c 318 s 403.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.